New York, session 2025-2026, S7376.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 58 of the civil 2 service law, including the age requirements under paragraph (a) of 3 subdivision 1 of such section, or any other provision of law to the 4 contrary, Karol Hughes, who has been continuously employed by the 5 town/village of East Rochester, in the county of Monroe, as a part-time 6 police officer, shall be eligible to take the competitive civil service 7 examination for the position of police officer and shall, contingent 8 upon her score on such examination, be eligible to be placed on the 9 eligible list for appointment as a full-time police officer with the 10 town/village of East Rochester police department. 11 § 2. Karol Hughes shall otherwise be subject to the merit and fitness 12 provisions of the civil service law applicable to full-time police offi- 13 cers. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09337-03-5